Dictionaries/DEUTSCH/DEUTSCH.AFF
#
# Present tense:
#
# ich,ihr-forms are seperated from du,er/sie/es-forms.
# Many (starke) verbs can only build the ich,ihr-form from the infinitive.
#       tragen/I > trage, tragt
#
# Also flag X is sometimes useful for past tense of Konjunktiv:
#       abnahmen/X > abnahmst, abnahmt
#
# For present tense regular (schwache) verbs, I and X will go together.
#
flag *I:
# ich
    E N                 >       -N,-            # Wie kommen    > komme
    [^SS] E L N         >       -ELN,LE         #     la"cheln  > la"chle
    SS E L N            >       -SSELN,sSLE     #     rasseln   > rasSle
    E L N               >       -LN,LE          # auch: la"cheln > la"chele
    [^SS] E R N         >       -ERN,RE         #     wandern   > wandre
    SS E R N            >       -SSERN,sSRE     #     wa"ssern  > wa"sSre
    E R N               >       -N,E            # auch: na"hern > na"here

# Ihr-form endings (redundant with er/sie/es most of the time)
    E [LR] N            >       -N,T            # Wie la"cheln  > la"chelt
    [DT] E N            >       -N,T
    [^DIMNSST] E N      >       -EN,T

    E I E N             >       -EN,T           #     schreien  > schreit
    [^E] I E N          >       -N,T            #     knien     > kniet

    C H N E N           >       -N,T
    [^C] H [MN] E N     >       -EN,T           # Wie nehmen    > nehmt

    [^AA"EHILMNOO"UU"R] [MN] E N
                        >       -N,T
    [AA"EILMNOO"UU"R] [MN] E N
                        >       -EN,T
    SS E N              >       -SSEN,sST

# special treatment for 'tun': (worthwile?)
    U N                 >       -N,E            #     tun > ich tue
    U N                 >       -N,EN           #     tun > wir tuen
    U N                 >       -N,T            #     tun > er  tut


flag *X:        # other present tense verb endings:
# Er/sie/es-form endings
    E [LR] N            >       -N,T            # Wie la"cheln  > la"chelt
    [DTW] E N           >       -N,T            #     arbeiten  > arbeitet
    E I E N             >       -EN,T           #     schreien  > schreit
# old form:
#    E I E N            >       -N,T            #     schreien  > schreiet

    [^E] I E N          >       -N,T            #     knien     > kniet
    [^DITMNSSW] E N     >       -EN,T           #     leben     > lebt

    C H N E N           >       -N,T            # Wie rechnen   > rechnet
    [^C] H [MN] E N     >       -EN,T           #     ahnen     > ahnt

    [^AA"EHILMNOO"UU"R] [MN] E N
                        >       -N,T            # Wie atmen     > atmet
    [AA"EILMNOO"UU"R] [MN] E N
                        >       -EN,T           # Wie lernen    > lernt

    SS E N              >       -SSEN,sST       #     hassen    > hasSt

# old fashioned imperative and ihr- form:
#    [BFGHKLMNPRSsSVX] E N
#                       >       -N,T            # Wie lernen    > lernet

    U N                 >       -N, T           #     tun       > tut
# old fashioned form:
#   U N                 >       -N, ET          #     tun       > tuet

# Er/sie/es-form ending from Du-form:
    T S T               >       -ST,-           # Wie trittst   > tritt

# Du-form endings
    E [LR] N            >       -N,ST           # Wie na"ehern  > na"eherst
    [DTW] E N           >       -N,ST           #     arbeiten  > arbeitest
    [^DIMNsSSSSTWZX] E N >      -EN,ST          #     leben     > lebst

    E I E N             >       -EN,ST          #     schreien  > schreist
    [^E] I E N          >       -N,ST           #     knien     > kniest

    C H N E N           >       -N,ST           # Wie rechnen   > rechnest
    [^C] H [MN] E N     >       -EN,ST          #     ahnen     > ahnst

    [^AA"EHILMNOO"UU"R] [MN] E N
                        >       -N,ST           # Wie atmen     > atmest
    [AA"EILMNOO"UU"R] [MN] E N
                        >       -EN,ST          # Wie lernen    > lernst

    U N                 >       -N, ST          #     tun       > tust

    [sSSSSXZ] E N       >       -EN,EST         # Wie heisSen   > heisSest

#   alternate form for -schen:
    S C H E N           >       -EN,EST         #     wischen   > wischest

#   the other form allowed is the same as above:
#   [sSSXZ] E N         >       -EN,T           # Wie heisSen   > heisSt
#   SS E N              >       -SSEN,sST       #     hassen    > hasSt

# Du-form ending from Er/sie/es-form:
    [^SZ] T             >       -T,ST           # Wie nimmt     > nimmst
    Z T                 >       -T,EST          #     schmilzt  > schmilzest

flag *Y:
# Past-tense ich/er/sie/es-form endings
    E [LR] N            >       -N,TE           # Wie la"cheln  > la"chelte
    [DTW] E N           >       -N,TE           #     arbeiten  > arbeitete
    [^DIMNSSTW] E N     >       -EN,TE          #     leben     > lebte

    E I E N             >       -EN,TE          #     freien    > freite
    [^E] I E N          >       -N,TE           #     knien     > kniete

    C H N E N           >       -N,TE           # Wie rechnen   > rechnete
    [^C] H [MN] E N     >       -EN,TE          #     ahnen     > ahnte

    [^AA"EHILMNOO"UU"R] [MN] E N
                        >       -N,TE           # Wie atmen     > atmete
    [AA"EILMNOO"UU"R] [MN] E N
                        >       -EN,TE          # Wie lernen    > lernte
    SS E N              >       -SSEN,sSTE      #     hassen    > hasSte

# Past-tense du-form endings
    E [LR] N            >       -N,TEST         # Wie la"cheln  > la"cheltest
    [DTW] E N           >       -N,TEST         #     arbeiten  > arbeitetest
    [^DIMNSSTW] E N     >       -EN,TEST        #     leben     > lebtest

    E I E N             >       -EN,TEST        #     freien    > freitest
    [^E] I E N          >       -N,TEST         #     knien     > knietest

    C H N E N           >       -N,TEST         # Wie rechnen   > rechnetest
    [^C] H [MN] E N     >       -EN,TEST        #     ahnen     > ahntest

    [^AA"EHILMNOO"UU"R] [MN] E N
                        >       -N,TEST         # Wie atmen     > atmetest
    [AA"EILMNOO"UU"R] [MN] E N
                        >       -EN,TEST        # Wie lernen    > lerntest
    SS E N              >       -SSEN,sSTEST    #     hassen    > hasStest

# Past-tense ihr-form endings
    E [LR] N            >       -N,TET          # Wie na"ehern  > na"ehertet
    [DTW] E N           >       -N,TET          #     rasten    > rastetet
    [^DIMNSSTW] E N     >       -EN,TET         #     rasen     > rastet

    E I E N             >       -EN,TET         #     freien    > freitet
    [^E] I E N          >       -N,TET          #     knien     > knietet

    C H N E N           >       -N,TET          # Wie rechnen   > rechnetet
    [^C] H [MN] E N     >       -EN,TET         #     ahnen     > ahntet

    [^AA"EHILMNOO"UU"R] [MN] E N
                        >       -N,TET          # Wie atmen     > atmetet
    [AA"EILMNOO"UU"R] [MN] E N
                        >       -EN,TET         # Wie lernen    > lerntet
    SS E N              >       -SSEN,sSTET     #     hassen    > hasStet

# Past-tense sie/Sie-form endings
    E [LR] N            >       -N, TEN         # Wie la"cheln  > la"chelten
    [DTW] E N           >       -N, TEN         #     arbeiten  > arbeiteten
    [^DIMNSSTW] E N     >       -EN,TEN         #     leben     > lebten

    E I E N             >       -EN,TEN         #     freien    > freiten
    [^E] I E N          >       -N,TEN          #     knien     > knieten

    C H N E N           >       -N, TEN         # Wie rechnen   > rechneten
    [^C] H [MN] E N     >       -EN,TEN         #     ahnen     > ahnten

    [^AA"EHILMNOO"UU"R] [MN] E N
                        >       -N, TEN         # Wie atmen     > atmeten
    [AA"EILMNOO"UU"R] [MN] E N
                        >       -EN,TEN         # Wie lernen    > lernten
    SS E N              >       -SSEN,sSTEN     #     hassen    > hasSten

# Past-tense endings for non-regular verbs and Konjunktiv forms from ich-form:
flag *Z:
# er/sie/es = ich
# du
    [^HsSSZ]            >       ST              # Wie wusSte    > wusStest
    [^C] H              >       ST              #     floh      > flohest
    [^S] C H            >       ST              #     wich      > wichst
# CH,D,F,K and T may also have an 'e' before 'st':
    [DFKSTZ]            >       EST             #     riet      > rietest
# There are verbs which don't have the -chest form below, such as 'brachst'
# or 'rochst'.  Then use 'brachen/WX', which is only slightly less elegant.
    C H                 >       EST             #     wusch     > wuschest
    [AU] sS             >       EST             #     asS       > asSest
    I E sS              >       EST             #     liesS     > liesSest
    [IO] sS             >       -sS,SSEST       #     gosS      > gossest

# ihr
    [^DT]               >       T               #     wu"sSte   > wu"sStet
    [DT]                >       ET              #     riet      > rietet
#   If you insist on all past tense ihr-forms ending in -et,
#   here is how to do it:
#   [ I didn't check if this is 'normal' or not, but it seems somewhat
#     old-fashioned to me.  My Duden (DDR '73) doesn't mention them ]
#   [^sS]               >       ET              #     hob       > hobet
#   sS                  >       -sS,SSET        #     schosS    > schosset

# wir/sie
    E                   >       N               #     hatte     > hatten
    I E                 >       EN              # auch: schrie  > schrieen
    [^EsS]              >       EN              #     nahm      > nahmen
    [AU] sS             >       EN              #     asS       > asSen
    I E sS              >       EN              #     liesS     > liesSen
    [IO] sS             >       -sS,SSEN        #     gosS      > gossen

flag *O:
#
# Partizip dekliniert: Wie  verarbeiten -> verarbeiteter
#
# This is similar to flag Y,  but will not necessaryly apply
# to all verbs which have regular (Y) past tense form.
#
# The forms to be generated are the same as for the A flag
# (which could be used with a different stem to do the same thing).
#
# flag *Y wil already produce the -e, -en forms.
#
# -tes
    E [LR] N            >       -N,TES          # Wie vererben  > vererbtes
    [DTW] E N           >       -N,TES
    [^DMNSSTW] E N      >       -EN,TES

    C H N E N           >       -N,TES
    [^C] H [MN] E N     >       -EN,TES

    [^AA"EHILMNOO"UU"R] [MN] E N
                        >       -N,TES
    [AA"EILMNOO"UU"R] [MN] E N
                        >       -EN,TES
    SS E N              >       -SSEN,sSTES
# -ter                                          # Wie erzielen > erzielter
    E [LR] N            >       -N,TER
    [DTW] E N           >       -N,TER
    [^DMNSSTW] E N      >       -EN,TER

    C H N E N           >       -N,TER
    [^C] H [MN] E N     >       -EN,TER

    [^AA"EHILMNOO"UU"R] [MN] E N
                        >       -N,TER
    [AA"EILMNOO"UU"R] [MN] E N
                        >       -EN,TER
    SS E N              >       -SSEN,sSTER
# -tem                                          # Wie verfluchen > verfluchtem
    E [LR] N            >       -N,TEM
    [DTW] E N           >       -N,TEM
    [^DMNSSTW] E N      >       -EN,TEM

    C H N E N           >       -N,TEM
    [^C] H [MN] E N     >       -EN,TEM

    [^AA"EHILMNOO"UU"R] [MN] E N
                        >       -N,TEM
    [AA"EILMNOO"UU"R] [MN] E N
                        >       -EN,TEM
    SS E N              >       -SSEN,sSTEM
